old/xu-hyphen/utf8-grphyph4.tex
σό5μ2πε σό5μ2πε σό5μ2πε ϲό5μ2πε ϲό5μ2πε ϲό5μ2πε 
σο5μ2πῶ σο5μ2πῶ ϲο5μ2πῶ ϲο5μ2πῶ 
σό5μ2πω σό5μ2πω σό5μ2πω ϲό5μ2πω ϲό5μ2πω ϲό5μ2πω 
σο5μ2πα ϲο5μ2πα 
σο5μ2πε ϲο5μ2πε 
σο5μ2πω ϲο5μ2πω 
.σού5μ2π .σού5μ2π .σού5μ2π .ϲού5μ2π .ϲού5μ2π .ϲού5μ2π   % so'u-mpitoc 
.σου5μ2π .ϲου5μ2π 
.ταβλα5μ2π   % tabla-mp'ac 
.τα5μ2π   % ta-mpo'uri ta-mpo'u ta-mpl'ac ta-mp'ela ta-mpaki'era 
.τα6μ3περαμ   % tam-peram'ento 
.τα6μ3ποῦρλ .τα6μ3ποῦρλ   % tam-po~urlo 
.τα6μ3πούρλ .τα6μ3πούρλ .τα6μ3πούρλ 
.τε5μ2πεσ .τε5μ2πεϲ   % te-mpes'iri 
.τζά5μ2π .τζά5μ2π .τζά5μ2π   % tz'a-mpa tza-mpatz'hc 
.τζα5μ2π 
.τζανα5μ2π   % tzana-mp'ethc tzana-mpeti'a 
.τζι5μ2π   % Tzi-mpout'i (= q'wra >Afrik~hc) Tzi-mpal'i (= p'olh Tourk'iac) 
.τζου5μ2π   % tzou-mp'ec (= panwf'ori) 
.τό5μ2πρ .τό5μ2πρ .τό5μ2πρ   % t'o-mproc to-mpros'unh To-mpro'uk (= p'olh >Afrik~hc) 
.το5μ2πρ 
.τρα5μ2πάλ .τρα5μ2πάλ .τρα5μ2πάλ   % tra-mp'ala tra-mpal'izomai 
.τρα5μ2παλ 
.τρα5μ2ποῦκ .τρα5μ2ποῦκ   % tra-mpo~ukoc 
.τρα5μ2πούκ .τρα5μ2πούκ .τρα5μ2πούκ 
.τρα5μ2πουκ 
.τσά5μ2πα .τσά5μ2πα .τσά5μ2πα .τϲά5μ2πα .τϲά5μ2πα .τϲά5μ2πα   % ts'a-mpa tsa-mpatz'hc 
.τσα5μ2πα .τϲα5μ2πα 
.τσι5μ2πούκ .τσι5μ2πούκ .τσι5μ2πούκ .τϲι5μ2πούκ .τϲι5μ2πούκ .τϲι5μ2πούκ   % tsi-mpo'uki 
.τσι5μ2πουκ .τϲι5μ2πουκ 
.τσι5μ2πούσ .τσι5μ2πούσ .τσι5μ2πούσ .τϲι5μ2πούϲ .τϲι5μ2πούϲ .τϲι5μ2πούϲ   % tsi-mpo'usi 
.τσι5μ2πουσ .τϲι5μ2πουϲ 
.φά5μ2πρικ .φά5μ2πρικ .φά5μ2πρικ   % f'a-mprika 
.φα5μ2πρικ 
.φρα5μ2π   % fra-mpal'ac 
.χα5μ2π   % qa-mp'ari qa-mp'eri 
.χό5μ2π .χό5μ2π .χό5μ2π   % q'o-mpu (i) 
.χοντρο5μ2πα   % qontro-mpal'ac 
%%%%
β5ν2τ 
ζ5ν2τ 
λ5ν2τ 
μν2τ 
ρ5ν2τ 
σν2τ ϲν2τ 
ἀ5ν2τάτζ ἀ5ν2τάτζ ἀ5ν2τάτζ   % >a-nt'atzio 
ἀτρα5ν2τέ ἀτρα5ν2τέ ἀτρα5ν2τέ   % >atra-nt'ec 
ἀτρα5ν2τὲ ἀτρα5ν2τὲ 
.βί5ν2τε .βί5ν2τε .βί5ν2τε   % b'i-nteo bi-nteok'amera 
.βι5ν2τε 
.γιαχου5ν2τ   % giaqou-nt'hc (= <ebra~ioc) 
.γιβε5ν2τ   % gibe-nt'izw 
.γκάι5ν2τ .γκάι5ν2τ .γκάι5ν2τ   % gk'ai-nta 
.γκάϊ5ν2τ .γκάϊ5ν2τ .γκάϊ5ν2τ 
.γκαϊ5ν2τ .γκαϊ5ν2τ 
.κα5ν2ταΐ .κα5ν2ταΐ .κα5ν2ταΐ   % ka-nta"'ifi 
.κα5ν2ταϊ .κα5ν2ταϊ 
.κα5ν2τρ   % ka-ntr'ilia 
.λικβι5ν2ταρ   % likbi-ntarism'oc (??? not so sure) 
.μαϊ5ν2τ .μαϊ5ν2τ   % ma"i-ntan'oc 
.μα5ν2τάμ .μα5ν2τάμ .μα5ν2τάμ   % ma-nt'am ma-ntam'itsa 
.μα5ν2τὰμ .μα5ν2τὰμ 
.μα5ν2ταμ 
.μα5ν2τέμ .μα5ν2τέμ .μα5ν2τέμ   % ma-nt'emi 
.μα5ν2τεμ 
.μεϊ5ν2τά .μεϊ5ν2τά .μεϊ5ν2τά   % me"i-nt'ani 
.μεϊ5ν2τα .μεϊ5ν2τα 
.μο5ν2τέλ .μο5ν2τέλ .μο5ν2τέλ   % mo-nt'elo mo-ntelism'oc 
.μο5ν2τελ 
μο5ν2τέρν μο5ν2τέρν μο5ν2τέρν   % mo-nt'erno metamo-nternism'oc 
μο5ν2τερν 
.μπαλά5ν2τ .μπαλά5ν2τ .μπαλά5ν2τ   % mpal'a-nta 
.μπαλα5ν2τ 
.μπα5ν2ταν   % mpa-ntan'ac 
.μπε5ν2τ   % mpe-nt'eli mpe-nt'eni 
.μπι5ν2τ   % mpi-nt'ec 
.μπου5ν2τα   % mpou-ntal'ac 
.μπου5ν2τρ   % mpou-ntro'umi 
.νισα5ν2τ .νιϲα5ν2τ   % nisa-nt'iri 
.ντα5ν2τ   % nta-nt'a 
.ντερμπε5ν2τ   % ntermpe-nt'erhc 
5ν2τίβαν 5ν2τίβαν 5ν2τίβαν   % mpaoulo-nt'ibano 
.ντου5ν2τούκ .ντου5ν2τούκ .ντου5ν2τούκ   % ntou-nto'uka 
.ντου5ν2τοῦκ .ντου5ν2τοῦκ 
.ντου5ν2τουκ 
.ξε5ν2τ   % xe-nt'unw x'e-ntutoc 
.ξέ5ν2τ .ξέ5ν2τ .ξέ5ν2τ 
ὀ5ν2τά ὀ5ν2τά ὀ5ν2τά   % >o-nt'ac 
ὀ5ν2τὰ ὀ5ν2τὰ 
ὀ5ν2τᾶ ὀ5ν2τᾶ 
.ρεζε5ν2τ   % reze-nt'a 
.ρε5ν2τί .ρε5ν2τί .ρε5ν2τί   % re-nt'ikolo 
.ρε5ν2τι 
.ροῦ5ν2τ .ροῦ5ν2τ   % ro~u-ntoc (= lept'oc) Ro'u-ntolf 
.ρού5ν2τ .ρού5ν2τ .ρού5ν2τ 
.σε5ν2τέφ .σε5ν2τέφ .σε5ν2τέφ .ϲε5ν2τέφ .ϲε5ν2τέφ .ϲε5ν2τέφ   % se-nt'efi 
.σε5ν2τεφ .ϲε5ν2τεφ 
.σε5ν2τοῦ .σε5ν2τοῦ .ϲε5ν2τοῦ .ϲε5ν2τοῦ   % se-nto~uki 
.σε5ν2τού .σε5ν2τού .σε5ν2τού .ϲε5ν2τού .ϲε5ν2τού .ϲε5ν2τού 
.σε5ν2του .ϲε5ν2του 
.τσα5ν2τί .τσα5ν2τί .τσα5ν2τί .τϲα5ν2τί .τϲα5ν2τί .τϲα5ν2τί   % tsa-nt'ila tsa-nt'iri 
.τσα5ν2τι .τϲα5ν2τι 
.φαστφου5ν2τ .φαϲτφου5ν2τ   % fastfou-nt'adiko 
.χα5ν2το   % qa-nto'umhc 
.χα5ν2τρ   % qa-ntr~wn, q'a-ntra 
.χά5ν2τρ .χά5ν2τρ .χά5ν2τρ 
%%%%
%%%% some `weird' terminations in words of Greek and non-Greek origin
%%%%
6βρ.   % >or-nt'ebr 
6γλ.   % (<od`oc Kar'olou) >'Ogl (B'oloc) 
6κλ.   % pi-n'akl 
6κτ.   % t'akt 
6κς. 6κϲ.   % t'ankc 
6κσ. 
6λς. 6λϲ.   % <'alc (<a-l'oc) 
6λσ. 
6μ2πλ.   % nt'ampl (pod'osfairo) 
6μ2πν.   % >'Impn (Sa"'int, >arabik'o >'onoma) 
6μ2πρ.   % romp-nte-s'ampr 
6μς. 6μϲ.   % Tz'eimc 
6μσ. 
6νς. 6νϲ.   % <'el-minc (<'el-min-joc) tr'anc 
6νσ. 
6ρς. 6ρϲ.   % (>empr`oc) m'arc 
6ρσ. 
6σκ. 6ϲκ.   % Noboros'isk (p'olh t~hc Rws'iac) 
6στ. 6ϲτ.   % k'arst mp'ost 
6τλ.   % Si'atl (p'olh t~wn HPA) 
6τρ.   % ma'itr 
6φτ.   % kriskr'aft 
6χτ.   % B'ermaqt (Germanik`oc Strat'oc) 
%%%%
%%%% some weird double-consonant combinations that may occur in 
%%%% words of non-greek origin like "romp-nte-s'ampr" (= robe de
%%%% chambre)
%%%%
6γ2κ5μ2π 
6γ2κ5ν2τ 
6γ2κ1τζ 
6γ2κ1τσ 6γ2κ1τϲ 
6μ2π5ν2τ 
6μ2π1τζ 
6μ2π1τσ 6μ2π1τϲ 
6ν2τ5μ2π 
6τσ5γ2κ 6τϲ5γ2κ 
6τσ5μ2π 6τϲ5μ2π 
6τσ5ν2τ 6τϲ5ν2τ 
%-- Vowel patterns
α1 ε1 η1 ι1 ο1 υ1 ω1 ϊ1 ϋ1 ἀ1 ἁ1 ἂ1 ἃ1 ἄ1 ἅ1 ἆ1 ἇ1 ἐ1 ἑ1 ἒ1 ἓ1 ἔ1 ἕ1 ἢ1 ἣ1 ἤ1 ἥ1 ἦ1 ἧ1 ἲ1 ἳ1 ἴ1 ἵ1 ἶ1 ἷ1 ὀ1 ὁ1 ὂ1 ὃ1 ὄ1 ὅ1 ὐ1 ὒ1 ὓ1 ὔ1 ὕ1 ὖ1 ὗ1 ὠ1 ὡ1 ὢ1 ὣ1 ὤ1 ὥ1 ὦ1 ὧ1 ὰ1 ὲ1 ὴ1 ὶ1 ὸ1 ὺ1 ὼ1 ᾀ1 ᾁ1 ᾂ1 ᾃ1 ᾄ1 ᾅ1 ᾆ1 ᾇ1 ᾐ1 ᾑ1 ᾒ1 ᾓ1 ᾔ1 ᾕ1 ᾖ1 ᾗ1 ᾠ1 ᾡ1 ᾢ1 ᾣ1 ᾤ1 ᾥ1 ᾦ1 ᾧ1 ᾲ1 ᾳ1 ᾴ1 ᾶ1 ᾷ1 ῂ1 ῃ1 ῄ1 ῇ1 ῒ1 ῗ1 ῢ1 ῧ1 ῲ1 ῳ1 ῴ1 ῶ1 ῷ1 ά1 έ1 ό1 ώ1 ΐ1 ΰ1 ά1 έ1 ό1 ώ1 ΐ1 ΰ1 α2́1 α2̀1 α2͂1 α2̓1 α2̓́1 α2̓̀1 α2̓͂1 α2̔1 α2̔́1 α2̔̀1 α2̔͂1 α2ͅ1 α2́ͅ1 α2̀ͅ1 α2͂ͅ1 α2̓ͅ1 α2̓́ͅ1 α2̓̀ͅ1 α2̓͂ͅ1 α2̔ͅ1 α2̔́ͅ1 α2̔̀ͅ1 α2̔͂ͅ1 α2̈1 α2̈́1 α2̈̀1 α2̈͂1 ε2́1 ε2̀1 ε2͂1 ε2̓1 ε2̓́1 ε2̓̀1 ε2̓͂1 ε2̔1 ε2̔́1 ε2̔̀1 ε2̔͂1 ε2ͅ1 ε2́ͅ1 ε2̀ͅ1 ε2͂ͅ1 ε2̓ͅ1 ε2̓́ͅ1 ε2̓̀ͅ1 ε2̓͂ͅ1 ε2̔ͅ1 ε2̔́ͅ1 ε2̔̀ͅ1 ε2̔͂ͅ1 ε2̈1 ε2̈́1 ε2̈̀1 ε2̈͂1 η2̀1 η2̓́1 η2̓̀1 η2̓͂1 η2̔́1 η2̔̀1 η2̔͂1 η2ͅ1 η2́ͅ1 η2̀ͅ1 η2͂ͅ1 η2̓ͅ1 η2̓́ͅ1 η2̓̀ͅ1 η2̓͂ͅ1 η2̔ͅ1 η2̔́ͅ1 η2̔̀ͅ1 η2̔͂ͅ1 η2̈1 η2̈́1 η2̈̀1 η2̈͂1 ι2̀1 ι2̓́1 ι2̓̀1 ι2̓͂1 ι2̔́1 ι2̔̀1 ι2̔͂1 ι2ͅ1 ι2́ͅ1 ι2̀ͅ1 ι2͂ͅ1 ι2̓ͅ1 ι2̓́ͅ1 ι2̓̀ͅ1 ι2̓͂ͅ1 ι2̔ͅ1 ι2̔́ͅ1 ι2̔̀ͅ1 ι2̔͂ͅ1 ι2̈1 ι2̈́1 ι2̈̀1 ι2̈͂1 ο2́1 ο2̀1 ο2͂1 ο2̓1 ο2̓́1 ο2̓̀1 ο2̓͂1 ο2̔1 ο2̔́1 ο2̔̀1 ο2̔͂1 ο2ͅ1 ο2́ͅ1 ο2̀ͅ1 ο2͂ͅ1 ο2̓ͅ1 ο2̓́ͅ1 ο2̓̀ͅ1 ο2̓͂ͅ1 ο2̔ͅ1 ο2̔́ͅ1 ο2̔̀ͅ1 ο2̔͂ͅ1 ο2̈1 ο2̈́1 ο2̈̀1 ο2̈͂1 υ2̀1 υ2̓1 υ2̓́1 υ2̓̀1 υ2̓͂1 υ2̔́1 υ2̔̀1 υ2̔͂1 υ2ͅ1 υ2́ͅ1 υ2̀ͅ1 υ2͂ͅ1 υ2̓ͅ1 υ2̓́ͅ1 υ2̓̀ͅ1 υ2̓͂ͅ1 υ2̔ͅ1 υ2̔́ͅ1 υ2̔̀ͅ1 υ2̔͂ͅ1 υ2̈1 υ2̈́1 υ2̈̀1 υ2̈͂1 ω2́1 ω2̀1 ω2͂1 ω2̓1 ω2̓́1 ω2̓̀1 ω2̓͂1 ω2̔1 ω2̔́1 ω2̔̀1 ω2̔͂1 ω2ͅ1 ω2́ͅ1 ω2̀ͅ1 ω2͂ͅ1 ω2̓ͅ1 ω2̓́ͅ1 ω2̓̀ͅ1 ω2̓͂ͅ1 ω2̔ͅ1 ω2̔́ͅ1 ω2̔̀ͅ1 ω2̔͂ͅ1 ω2̈1 ω2̈́1 ω2̈̀1 ω2̈͂1 
}
\endgroup
\endinput
